District of Columbia statutes.
50-211.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Alternative fuel” means fuels defined as alternative fuels by 42 U.S.C. § 13211(2).

(2)

“Bikeshare” means the Capital Bikeshare program or its successor programs that allow point-to-point bicycle sharing at stations throughout the District

(3)

“Chauffeur” means a District employee who is assigned the official duty of regularly driving a supervising employee to and from the employee’s home, appointments, or work sites, and who does not have an official purpose for travel beyond driving the supervising employee.

(4)

“Compact vehicle” means a vehicle with an interior volume index greater than or equal to 100 cubic feet but less than 110 cubic feet as set forth in the description of a compact car as defined by the vehicle class size set forth in 40 C.F.R. § 600.315-08 (a)(1)(iv), approved December 27, 2006.

(5)

“Director” means the Director of the Department of Public Works or the Director’s designee.

(6)

“DPW” means the Department of Public Works.

(7)

“Emergency vehicle” means a vehicle authorized by the District to exceed the speed limit to transport people or equipment to and from situations in which speed is required to save lives or property and that is equipped with audible and visual signals capable of being seen and heard from a distance of not less than 500 feet.

(8)

“Fleetshare” means the District’s centrally managed motor pool of passenger vehicles that are available for District employee use for official purposes through advance reservation and billed to the agency according to use.

(9)

“Fuel economy” means the average number of miles traveled by an automobile for each gallon of gasoline (or equivalent amount of other fuel) used, as determined by the Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency.

(10)

“Heavy equipment” means vehicles or vehicle attachments that cannot be classified as either passenger or non-passenger vehicles and that are used to perform road maintenance, construction, earth-moving, or another specialized function.

(11)

“Large vehicle” means a vehicle with an interior volume index greater than or equal to 120 cubic feet as set forth in the description of a large car as defined by the vehicle class size set forth in 40 C.F.R § 600.315-08(a)(1)(vi), approved December 27, 2006.

(12)

“Passenger vehicle” means any automobile, other than an automobile designed for off-highway operation, manufactured primarily for the transportation of no more than 15 individuals.

(13)

“Specialized vehicle” means a vehicle uniquely outfitted for service based on an agency’s mission.

(14)

“Vehicle” means an automobile or motorcycle classified for on- Highway operation, excluding a sub-class generally considered to be a specialized vehicle or heavy equipment. The term “vehicle” shall not mean bicycles, pedicycles, personal mobility devices such as Segways or motorized wheelchairs, or other non-motorized conveyances.

Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-223, § 101, 59 DCR 13537

Section 301 of D.C. Law 19-223 provided:

“Rules.

“(a)(1) The Mayor, pursuant to Title 1 of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this act within 120 days of its effective date [March 5, 2013].

“(2) The proposed rules, and any subsequent amendments, shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

“(b) The existing rules regarding fleet management in the District, to the degree that they are consistent with this act, shall remain in effect until they are superseded by rules issued in accordance with subsection (a) of this section.”

Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-223 provided that §§ 101, 102, 104, 105(a), 105(b), 106, 107, 201(a), 201(b), 201(c), 202, 203, and 301 of the act shall apply as of Mar. 5, 2013.